Washington statutes.
RCW 3.02.040

Electronic recording equipment.

The administrator for the courts may be consulted for advice on the selection, installation, and operation of any electronic recording equipment in courts of limited jurisdiction.

[ 2016 c 74 s 3; 1980 c 162 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective dates, savings—Severability—1980 c 162: See notes following RCW 3.02.010.